Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5289.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 26c. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a notary public may utilize a 2-way real-time audiovisual technology to perform notarial acts electronically if all of the following requirements are met: (a) The 2-way real-time audiovisual technology allows direct interaction between the individual seeking the notary's services, any witnesses, and the notary, so that each individual can communicate simultaneously by sight and sound through an electronic device or process at the time of the notarization. (b) The 2-way real-time audiovisual technology is capable of creating can create an audio and visual recording of the complete notarial act and the recording is made and retained as a notarial record in accordance with section 26b(7) to (9). (c) The individual seeking the notary's services and any required witnesses, if not personally known to the notary, presents satisfactory evidence of identity to the notary before the video conference that allows the notary to confirm the identity through credential analysis and identity proofing, and presents satisfactory evidence of identity to the notary again during the video conference , and does not merely transmit it before or after the transaction, that allows the notary to reconfirm the identity, to satisfy the requirements of this act and any other applicable law. (d) Subject to subdivision (e), the individual seeking the notary's services affirmatively represents that the individual is physically situated in this state or is physically located outside the geographic boundaries of this state and that 1 of the following applies: (i) The record is intended for filing with or relates to a matter before a court, governmental entity, public official, or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of this state. (ii) The record involves property located in the territorial jurisdiction of this state or a transaction substantially connected to this state. (e) If an individual is physically located outside of the geographic boundaries of this state, the notary has no actual knowledge that the individual's act of making the statement or signing the record is prohibited by the laws of the jurisdiction in which the individual is physically located. (f) The individual seeking the notary's services, any required witnesses, and the notary are able to affix their each individual's signatures to the record in a manner that renders any subsequent change or modification of the remote online notarial act to be tamper evident. (g) The individual seeking the notary's services or the individual's designee transmits by facsimile, mail, or electronic means a legible copy of the entire signed record directly to the notary on the same date it the record was signed. This requirement applies regardless of the manner in which the record is signed. (h) Once the notary has received a legible copy of the record with all necessary signatures, the notary notarizes the record in accordance with section 27 and transmits the notarized record back to the individual seeking the notary's services. (2) The official date and time of the notarization performed under this section is the date and time when the notary witnesses the signature via 2-way real-time audiovisual technology as required under this section. (3) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation of this state, beginning April 30, 2020, and before July 1, 2021, absent an express prohibition in a record against signing the record in counterparts, a record signed under this act may be signed in counterparts. (4) This section applies to a notarial act described in subsection (1) performed on or after April 30, 2020. and before July 1, 2021. (5) If a record is notarized electronically under this section, all of the following apply: (a) The record does not need to be notarized under any other provision of this act. (b) The rights or interests of a person that relies in good faith and without actual notice that the record was executed on or after April 30, 2020 and before July 1, 2021 but was not executed or notarized in accordance with this section are not impaired, challenged, or terminated on that basis alone. (c) Compliance with this section is presumed. A person challenging a record notarized under this section may overcome the presumption by establishing, by clear and convincing evidence, that the notary or the individual seeking the notary public's services intentionally failed to comply with a requirement described in this section. Sec. 26d. (1) Beginning April 30, 2020, it is the intent of the legislature that, governmental agencies and officials of this state are encouraged to use or permit the use of electronic records and electronic signatures to transact business, process applications, and recognize the validity of legal instruments, and, when a notarized signature is required by a law of this state, to use a notary public who performs notarial acts electronically under this act. (2) Beginning April 30, 2020, it is the intent of the legislature that, any requirement under the law of this state that an in-person witness attests to or acknowledges an instrument, record, or deed is satisfied by the use of 2-way real-time audiovisual technology in accordance with section 26c. (3) Beginning April 30, 2020, it is the intent of the legislature that, any requirement that an individual appears personally before or be in the presence of either a notary public at the time of a notarization or a witness at the time of an attestation or acknowledgment is satisfied if the individual, the witnesses, or the notary public are not in the physical presence of each other but can communicate simultaneously by 2-way real-time audiovisual technology in accordance with section 26c at the time of the notarization, attestation, or acknowledgment. (4) This section does not apply after June 30, 2021.